Idaho statutes. Title 20 STATE PRISON AND COUNTY JAILS
Chapter 2 STATE BOARD OF CORRECTION
§ 20-229A. Notice — Service — Waiver.

Within fifteen (15) calendar days following arrest and detention on a warrant issued by the Idaho commission for pardons and parole, the alleged parole violator shall be personally served with a copy of the factual allegations of the violation of the conditions of parole by a state probation and parole officer, a law enforcement official or other as designated by the executive director. When accused of a violation of his parole, other than by absconding supervision or the commission of and conviction for a felony or misdemeanor, the alleged parole violator shall be advised of the right to an on-site parole revocation hearing and of procedural rights and privileges as provided by this act. The alleged parole violator, after service of the allegation of violations of the conditions of parole and the notification of rights, may waive the on-site parole revocation hearing as provided by section 20-229, Idaho Code. If the alleged parole violator waives the right to an on-site hearing, the commission, executive director or hearing officer shall designate the facility where the hearing will be conducted.

Whenever a paroled prisoner is accused of a violation of his parole by absconding supervision or the commission of and conviction for a felony or misdemeanor under the laws of this state, or any other state, or any federal laws, and following arrest and detention on a warrant issued by the Idaho commission for pardons and parole, the alleged parole violator shall be personally served with a copy of the factual allegations of the violation of the conditions of parole within a reasonable time. The alleged parole violator shall be advised of the right to a hearing and all other rights and privileges as provided by this act. The executive director or hearing officer shall designate the facility where the hearing will be conducted. A fair and impartial hearing of the charges will be conducted within a reasonable time.

The alleged parole violator may waive the right to any hearing, and at that time may admit one (1) or more of the alleged violations of the conditions of parole. If the waiver is accepted by the commission or hearing officer: (i) the parolee may be reinstated under the same or modified conditions, or (ii) the parolee shall be subject to an expedited determination by the commission consistent with the provisions of section 20-229B, Idaho Code, without a hearing. If all waivers made by the parolee are rejected by the commission or designated hearing officer, a parole revocation hearing shall be held either on-site or at a penitentiary facility.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-229A, as added by 1970, ch. 105, § 4, p. 263; am. 1980, ch. 297, § 12, p. 768; 1983, ch. 249, § 1, p. 670; am. 1994, ch. 171, § 5, p. 382; am. 2014, ch. 150, § 16, p. 414.

§ 20-229B. Commission rulings.

After a factual parole revocation hearing has been concluded, the member or members of the commission for pardons and parole or the designated hearing officer, having heard the matter, shall render a decision within twenty (20) days. If the alleged parole violator waives the parole hearing pursuant to the provisions of section 20-229A(3), Idaho Code, then a decision shall be entered upon acceptance of the waiver.

If the member or members or hearing officer, having heard the matter, should conclude that the allegations of violation of the conditions of parole have not been proven by a preponderance of the evidence, or those which have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence are not sufficient cause for the revocation of parole, then the parolee shall be reinstated on parole on the same or modified conditions of parole.

If the member or members or hearing officer, having heard the matter, should conclude that the allegations of violation of the conditions of parole have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence and constitute sufficient cause for the revocation of parole, then a dispositional hearing shall be convened during a regular session of the commission to impose any sanctions up to and including executing an order of parole revocation and determine the period of time the parole violator shall be returned to state custody.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-229B, as added by 1970, ch. 105, § 5, p. 263; am. 1994, ch. 171, § 6, p. 382; am. 2014, ch. 150, § 17, p. 414; am. 2015, ch. 295, § 1, p. 1173; am. 2016, ch. 267, § 1, p. 719; am. 2017, ch. 182, § 5, p. 414.

§ 20-230. Application to convictions prior to act.

Provisions of this act so far as applicable thereto are to apply to all convicted persons now serving time in the state penitentiary to the end that at all times the same provisions relating to sentences, imprisonment, and paroles of prisoners shall apply to the inmate thereof.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 30, p. 59; am. 1980, ch. 297, § 13, p. 768.

§ 20-231. Immunity from parole or release of a prisoner.

Neither a public entity nor a public employee or servant shall be financially responsible or liable for any injury resulting from determining whether to parole or release a prisoner or from determining the terms or conditions of his parole or release or from determining whether to revoke his parole or release.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-231, as added by 1980, ch. 297, § 15, p. 768.

§ 20-232. Remission of fine or penalty certified to court. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 32, p. 59; am. 1969, ch. 419, § 6, p. 1160; am. 1980, ch. 297, § 16, p. 768.

§ 20-233. Final discharge of parolee — Minimum term.

When any paroled prisoner has performed the obligations of his parole for such time as shall satisfy the commission that his final release is not incompatible with his welfare and that of society, the commission may make the final order of discharge and issue to the paroled prisoner a certificate of discharge; but no such order of discharge shall be made in any case within a period of less than one (1) year after the date of release on parole, except that when the period of the maximum sentence provided by law shall expire at an earlier date, then a final order of discharge must be made and a certificate of discharge issued to the paroled prisoner not later than the date of expiration of said maximum sentence.

The board of correction may submit a request to the commission for an order of final discharge from the remaining period of parole for any parolee under the board’s supervision at any time during the period of parole. A request for final discharge shall be supported by a statement attested to under oath or signed under penalty of perjury pursuant to section 9-1406, Idaho Code, setting forth the facts upon which the request is based. The commission shall notify the victim of a request for final discharge from parole. Any response to a request for final discharge shall be filed within thirty (30) days of the date of submittal of the request. The commission may, without a hearing, rule upon a request for final discharge based on a review of the case, the request, the statement and any responses to the request, or may schedule a hearing on the request. The commission shall rule on the request for final discharge within ninety (90) days of the date of submittal of the request.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 33, p. 59; am. 1980, ch. 297, § 17, p. 768; am. 2014, ch. 150, § 18, p. 414.

§ 20-234. Parole information to be transmitted to the sheriff and county prosecutor.

Whenever any person committed to the custody of the state board of correction shall have been granted a parole by the commission, it shall be the duty of the commission to transmit to the sheriff and the prosecuting attorney of the county within which said prisoner shall be paroled, a copy of the parole agreement, and information as to the place of residence of said prisoner within said county and the sheriff shall notify local law enforcement and other pertinent agencies.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 34, p. 59; am. 1970, ch. 143, § 10, p. 425; am. 1974, ch. 6, § 6, p. 28; am. 1980, ch. 297, § 18, p. 768; am. 1984, ch. 85, § 1, p. 168.

§ 20-235. Certification and warrants for expenses.

The chairman of the state board of correction, or his designee, is hereby authorized to certify all sums to be expended by said board in carrying out the purpose of this act to the state board of examiners, and the state board of examiners, upon the approval of said sums, shall cause the state controller to draw warrants for the amount of the same.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 35, p. 59; am. 1974, ch. 6, § 7, p. 28; am. 1994, ch. 180, § 12, p. 420.

§ 20-236. Members or employees of board not to be interested in contracts — Penalty for violation.

No member or employee of the state board of correction shall be interested directly or indirectly in any manner in contracts for furnishing the penitentiary or any property used in connection therewith or inmates thereof, any supplies, materials, equipment, or for the use of said institution. Nor shall any officer or employee be permitted to receive in any way perquisites for themselves or family, or any compensation or reward from any contractor or employee or other person. Should any officer or employee violate, or wilfully or negligently fail to observe the provisions and prohibitions of this section, he shall be at once dismissed from office by the state board of correction; and further, upon conviction of such violation by a court of competent jurisdiction, he shall be fined a sum not exceeding $1,000.00 and not less than one month’s pay, and shall forfeit his interest in any and all contracts or rewards he may have received or agreed to receive in violation of the provisions of this section.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 36, p. 59.

§ 20-237. Transmission of convicted persons to penitentiary or custody of board — Notice of conviction to director — Transported by guards — Time for notice.

When any person is convicted in any court of the state and sentenced to imprisonment and committed to the custody of the state board of correction, or sentenced to suffer the death penalty, the sheriff of the county in which such conviction shall have been had shall immediately, upon passing of sentence, notify the director that a person is in his custody. Such notice shall be transmitted by either telegraph or telephone, followed by a written confirmation by certified mail. As soon as possible upon receipt of such notice, the director shall dispatch one or more correctional officers, as may be necessary, from the department to the place where the convicted person is detained, to secure and convey said convicted person to any department of correction facility, or other facility within the state designated by the state board of correction. The convicted person, a certified copy of the judgment, a copy of the presentence investigation report, if any, a copy of any disciplinary reports filed against the convicted person while in the sheriff’s custody and all of the additional documents and allowable personal property, including medications as set forth in section 20-243, Idaho Code, shall be delivered into the custody of the director or his representative at the time of or prior to the delivery of the convicted person to the department. If all such records, documents, and property are not delivered at that time, the director or his representative may refuse to accept or transport the convicted person to a department facility.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 37, p. 59; am. 1967, ch. 364, § 3, p. 1052; am. 1969, ch. 419, § 7, p. 1160; am. 1970, ch. 143, § 11, p. 425; am. 1991, ch. 116, § 1, p. 244.

§ 20-237A. Funding per diem costs of state prisoners housed in county jails, related additional expenses and manner of payment.

The board of correction shall pay each county for housing prisoners convicted, sentenced and committed to the custody of the state board of correction, including probationers and parolees committed to a county jail under section 20-219(7)(b), Idaho Code, beginning on the day after receipt by the director of notice that a person is in custody, as provided in section 20-237, Idaho Code.

The state board of correction shall pay counties housing state-sentenced prisoners a minimum rate of fifty-five dollars ($55.00) per day per inmate for the first seven (7) days of custody and seventy-five dollars ($75.00) per day per inmate thereafter. Nothing stated herein will prohibit the state board of correction from entering into a contract with a county pursuant to section 20-241, Idaho Code.

In addition to payment of per diem costs as provided in this section, the state board of correction shall pay for all ordinary and necessary medical and dental expenses of state prisoners housed in county jails.

As between themselves, the state board of correction and each of the counties will be responsible for their pro rata share of any property damages or personal injuries arising from the housing of state-sentenced prisoners, which is attributable to their respective negligence or otherwise wrongful conduct. This provision shall not alter or affect any immunities or exceptions to governmental liability the state or counties may possess as to private persons pursuant to the Idaho tort claims act, chapter 9, title 6, Idaho Code.

The legislature shall appropriate sufficient funds annually to the department of correction to make all payments to counties as required in this section.

The county sheriffs shall bill the department of correction at least every sixty (60) days. The department of correction shall pay such bills within sixty (60) days of their receipt.

The germane committees of the legislature shall review the costs of housing inmates in county jails every three (3) years beginning in 2004.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-237A, as added by 1992, ch. 80, § 1, p. 221; am. 2000, ch. 135, § 1, p. 354; am. 2014, ch. 239, § 1, p. 603; am. 2015, ch. 103, § 1, p. 246; am. 2018, ch. 122, § 1, p. 259.

§ 20-237B. Medical costs of state prisoners housed in correctional facilities.

The state board of correction or any privatized medical provider under contract with the department of correction shall pay to a provider of a medical service, other than hospital inpatient or outpatient services, for any and all prisoners, committed to the custody of the department of correction, confined in a correctional facility, as defined in section 18-101A(1), Idaho Code, an amount equal to the reimbursement rates of the Idaho medicaid reimbursement fee schedule in place at the time services are provided. Hospitals shall be paid for inpatient and outpatient facility services provided to such prisoners in an amount equal to the interim Idaho medicaid rates in place at the time of service except for outpatient services paid by Idaho medicaid according to the Idaho medicaid fee schedule. These limitations apply to all medical care services provided outside the facility, including inpatient and outpatient hospitalizations, emergency services, professional services, durable and nondurable goods, prescription drugs and medications provided to any and all prisoners confined in a correctional facility, as defined in section 18-101A(1), Idaho Code. For services that are not included in the Idaho medicaid fee schedule or the interim Idaho medicaid rates, the state board of correction or any privatized medical provider under contract with the department of correction shall pay the reasonable value of such service. If a privatized medical provider is contracted with the department of correction, no hospital or any medical services provider shall be required to provide medical services to prisoners, except for emergency hospital services, in the absence of a contract between the privatized medical provider and the hospital or medical services provider. Any contract between the department of correction and a privatized medical provider must contain a requirement that the privatized medical provider enter into contracts with each hospital providing non-emergency services outside of the correctional facility. The contract between the privatized medical provider and the department of correction shall require, and the contracts between the privatized medical provider and any hospital or non-hospital providers shall include, at least the following terms reasonably and practicably consistent with those used by Idaho medicaid:

Claims adjudication processing;

Timing;

Payment;

Authorizations;

Utilization review;

Audit; and

Appeals processes.

Subsection (1) of this section shall apply only to companies, professional associations and other health care service entities whose services are billed directly to the department of correction or any privatized medical provider under contract with the department of correction. Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to:

Privatized correctional medical providers under contract with the department of correction to provide health care to prison inmates;

Private prison companies;

Out-of-state correctional facilities contracting with the department of correction to house prisoners;

County jails; and

Companies, professional associations and other health care service entities whose services are provided within the terms of agreements with privatized correctional medical providers under contract with private prison companies and county jails.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-237B, as added by 2005, ch. 157, § 1, p. 487; am. 2008, ch. 61, § 1, p. 153; am. 2018, ch. 321, § 2, p. 749.

§ 20-238. Clothing and transportation to be furnished prisoners upon parole or final discharge.

Upon the release of any convicted person upon parole the state board of correction shall provide him or her with necessary wearing apparel and may also provide him or her with a bus or railroad transportation ticket to the place designated for parole, together with sufficient cash to procure meals in transit. Upon final discharge from the penitentiary, the board shall provide the convicted person with similar clothing and may furnish transportation and cash for meals to his home, or to the place from which the convicted person was committed to the penitentiary.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 38, p. 59.

§ 20-239. Discharge upon service of maximum term.

Any convicted person undergoing sentence in the penitentiary not sooner released under the provisions of this chapter, shall in accordance with the provisions of existing law, be discharged from custody upon serving a maximum sentence provided by law for the offense of which such person was convicted, or the maximum term fixed by the court where the law does not provide for a maximum term. Provided however, if the date of discharge from custody falls on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the person may be discharged from custody on the last weekday immediately preceding such Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 39, p. 59; am. 2007, ch. 32, § 1, p. 74.

§ 20-239A. Release upon grant of parole.

Any convicted person undergoing sentence in the penitentiary who has a parole eligibility date which falls on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday may be granted a parole release date by the Idaho commission for pardons and parole which falls on the last weekday immediately preceding such Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-239A, as added by 2008, ch. 42, § 1, p. 99.

§ 20-240. Respites and reprieves.

The governor shall have power to grant respites or reprieves in all cases of convictions for offenses against the state, except treason or imprisonment on impeachment, but such respites or reprieves shall not extend beyond the next session of the commission; and such commission shall at such session continue or determine such respite or reprieve, or may commute or pardon the offense as herein provided.

In cases of conviction of treason, the governor shall have the power to suspend the execution of the sentence until the case shall be reported to the legislature at its next regular session, when the legislature shall either pardon or commute the sentence, direct its execution or grant a further reprieve.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 40, p. 59; 1969, ch. 419, § 8, p. 1160; am. 1988, ch. 323, § 1, p. 982; am. 2020, ch. 62, § 1, p. 145.

§ 20-240A. Commutations and pardons.

The commission shall have full and final authority to grant commutations and pardons after conviction and judgment in all cases of offenses against the state except treason or impeachment and as otherwise provided in this section.

With respect to commutations and pardons for offenses, or conspiracies to commit any offense, for which the maximum punishment allowed by law at the time of sentencing is death or life imprisonment, the commission’s determination shall only constitute a recommendation subject to approval or disapproval by the governor. No commutation or pardon for such offenses shall be effective until presented to and approved by the governor. Any commutation or pardon recommendation not so approved within thirty (30) days of the commission’s recommendation shall be deemed denied.

Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the commission shall have full and final authority to grant pardons and commutations for:

Any offense in violation of chapter 27, title 37, Idaho Code, for which the maximum punishment allowed by law at the time of sentencing is life imprisonment; and

Any offense for which the maximum punishment allowed by law at the time of sentencing is enhanced by chapter 25, title 19, Idaho Code, to life imprisonment.

The commission shall conduct commutation and pardon proceedings pursuant to rules and regulations adopted in accordance with law and may attach such conditions as it deems appropriate in granting pardons or commutations.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-240A, as added by 2020, ch. 62, § 2, p. 145.

§ 20-240B. Notice of pardon, commutation, or remission of fines and forfeitures.

When, by action of the commission or the governor, a pardon, commutation, or remission of fines and forfeitures is granted as provided by law, the executive director shall:

Retain an original pardon, commutation, or remission of fines and forfeitures document at the commission;

File a copy of the original pardon, commutation, or remission of fines and forfeitures document in the office of the secretary of state;

Provide an original pardon, commutation, or remission of fines and forfeitures document to the individual petitioner;

File notice with the state courts, in a manner approved by the supreme court, that a pardon, commutation, or remission of fines and forfeitures has been granted in the case; and

Provide such additional notice that a pardon, commutation, or remission of fines and forfeitures has been granted as the commission may adopt by rule.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-240B, as added by 2020, ch. 60, § 1, p. 143.

§ 20-241. Acceptance of federal or other funds or property.

The state board of correction, with the written consent of the governor, shall have the power and it shall be its duty:

To accept from the United States of America or any of its agencies, such funds, equipment, and supplies as may be made available to this state for any of the purposes contemplated by law, and to enter into such contract and agreements with the United States or any of its agencies, or other states, as may be necessary, proper and convenient, not contrary to the laws of the state.

To enter into an agreement with the board of county commissioners of any county, or with the governing officials of any municipality of this state for the payment by said county or municipality of all or any part of the cost of performance by the state board of correction of any parole or probation services or the supervision of any parole or probation case arising within the said county or municipality, as the case may be, or the maintenance therein of work camps as authorized by law.

To accept any grant or donation of land or any gift of money or valuable thing made to the state for any of the purposes contemplated by law.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 41, p. 59; am. 1970, ch. 143, § 12, p. 425; am. 1997, ch. 223, § 2, p. 655.

§ 20-241A. Agreements for confinement of inmates.

The state board of correction shall have the power and it shall be its duty:

To determine the availability of state facilities suitable for the detention and confinement of prisoners held under authority of state law. If the state board of correction determines that suitable state facilities are not available, it may enter into an agreement with the proper authorities of the United States, another state, a political subdivision of this state or another state, or a private prison contractor, to provide for the safekeeping, care, subsistence, proper government, discipline, and to provide programs for the reformation, rehabilitation and treatment of prisoners. Facilities made available to the state board of correction by agreement may be in this state, or in any other state, territory or possession of the United States. The state board of correction shall not enter into an agreement with an authority unable to provide the degree or kind of safekeeping, care and subsistence required by state or federal laws, the constitution of the state of Idaho, the United States constitution, and the rules adopted by the state board of correction. All contracts or agreements entered into by the state board of correction and a private prison contractor shall be subject to the provisions of this section and section 20-209, Idaho Code.

An authority or private prison contractor, receiving physical custody for the purpose of incarceration of a person sentenced by a court under the terms of an agreement made under this section, shall be considered as acting solely as an agent of this state. This state retains jurisdiction over a person incarcerated in an institution of another state, the United States, a political subdivision of this state or another state, or of a private institution;

The attorney general of this state shall enforce an agreement or contract made under this section in a civil suit.

The state board of correction shall have the authority to enter into contracts with private prison contractors for the site selection, design, design/building, acquisition, construction, construction management, maintenance, leasing, leasing/purchasing, management or operation of private prison facilities or any combination of these services, subject to the following requirements and limitations:

Any request for proposals, any original contract, any contract renewal, any price or cost adjustment or any other amendment to any contract for the incarceration of individuals in a private institution, shall be reviewed by the board of correction;

No contract authorized by the provisions of this section shall be awarded until the private prison contractor demonstrates to the satisfaction of the state board of correction that the contractor possesses the necessary qualifications and experience to provide the services specified in the contract; that the contractor can provide the necessary qualified personnel to implement the terms of the contract; that the financial condition of the contractor is such that the terms of the contract can be fulfilled; that the contractor has the ability to comply with applicable court orders and corrections standards; and that the proposed private prison facilities or the correctional services proposed by the contractor meet constitutional minimums;

No contract authorized by the provisions of this section shall be awarded until the private prison contractor demonstrates to the satisfaction of the state board of correction that the contractor can obtain insurance or provide self-insurance to indemnify the state against possible claims arising from the operation of prison facilities by the contractor, and to compensate the state for any losses incurred due to the operation of prison facilities;

Contracts awarded to private prison contractors pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be entered into for a period specified in each contract, subject to availability of funds annually appropriated by the Idaho legislature for that purpose. No contract awarded pursuant to this section shall provide for the encumbrance of funds beyond the amount available for a fiscal year;

A contract may provide for annual contract price or cost adjustments, except that any adjustments may be made only once each year effective on the anniversary of the effective date of the contract.

Any contract between the state board of correction and a private prison contractor, whereby the contractor provides for the housing, care, and control of inmates in a nondepartmental facility operated by the contractor, shall contain, in addition to other provisions, terms and conditions:

A requirement that the contractor is to provide said services in a facility which meets standards as required by the Idaho department of correction;

If a private prison institution is to be located in the state of Idaho on private land, it shall be required that the contractor obtain written authorization from the governing board of any municipality in which the facility is to be located, or if the facility is not to be located within the municipality, written authorization from the board of county commissioners of the county in which the facility is to be located;

A requirement that the private prison contractor shall provide training to its personnel to a level acceptable to the Idaho department of correction. The Idaho department of correction may provide training to the personnel of a private prison contractor and may charge a reasonable fee for the training, not to exceed the cost of training. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to confer peace officer status upon any employee of the private prison contractor or to authorize the use of firearms except to prevent escape from the facility or from custody while being transported to or from the facility or to prevent an act which would cause death or serious bodily injury to any person. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to confer Idaho state employee status upon any employee of the private prison contractor;

A requirement that any private prison contractor operating a facility that houses prisoners pursuant to a contract between the contractor and the state board of correction shall cooperate with the Idaho department of correction for the prevention and suppression of serious disturbances, including riots, escapes, affrays or insurrections, at the private prison facilities. To effectuate this provision, the contract shall, at a minimum, provide:

For participation by the private prison contractor in multiagency training for the preventing and responding to serious disturbances at a private prison facility;

For participation by the private prison contractor in multiagency agreements for the prevention of and response to serious disturbances at a private prison facility and reimbursement for emergency services provided by governmental entities;

For notification by the private prison contractor to the director of the Idaho department of correction in the event of a serious disturbance at a private prison facility and for consultation by the director of the Idaho department of correction with the private prison contractor prior to a response by the director of the Idaho department of correction;

That the private prison contractor shall provide access to the private prison facility for the Idaho department of correction and such other governmental entities or agencies as the Idaho department of correction may designate, including space to establish a command post, for responding to a serious disturbance;
(v) That, in the event of a serious disturbance, the private prison contractor shall participate in a unified command structure under the director of the Idaho department of correction until, in the director of the Idaho department of correction’s discretion, the serious disturbance is resolved.

Contracts awarded under the provisions of this section shall, at a minimum, comply with the following:

Provide for internal and perimeter security to protect the public, employees and inmates;

Provide that the private prison contractor shall not benefit financially from the labor of inmates nor shall any inmate ever be placed in a position of authority over another inmate. Any profits realized from the operation of a prison enterprise program shall revert to the department of correction or appropriate governmental authority. Private prison contractors may work with the Idaho department of correction in setting up work and training programs. Private prison contractors shall be authorized to purchase services and commodities from the Idaho department of correction which are necessary for implementing work or training opportunities as outlined in this section;

Impose discipline on inmates only in accordance with applicable Idaho department of correction rules and procedures;

Provide proper food, clothing, housing and medical care as provided for in the contract.

A private prison contractor, in carrying out its duties and responsibilities under contract with the state board of correction, shall not be bound by the enactments of the legislature which govern the appointment, qualifications, duties, salaries or benefits of wardens, managers or other correctional employees. No employee of the private prison contractor shall be considered an employee of the state of Idaho. A private prison contractor shall not employ any person who does not satisfy the board of correction’s personnel policies.

The director of the Idaho department of correction or his designee shall monitor the performance of the private prison contractor. In all such contracts the state shall retain clear supervisory and monitoring powers over the operation and management of the private institutions to insure that the inmates are properly cared for and that the employees of the facility and the public are adequately protected. Included in the powers and responsibilities of the director of the Idaho department of correction or his designee when acting as the chief contract monitor of the private prison contract are:

Approval of all inmate releases on furlough or work release;

Approval of the type of work offenders may perform pursuant to this section and review and approval of any incentive pay plan presented by the private prison contractor for offender pay;

Approval of the training program for the private prison contractor’s employees;

A determination if the minimum requirements of the contract are being satisfactorily performed;

Promulgation of rules interpreting or making specific application of the provisions of this section;

A determination if appropriate policies and procedures of the Idaho department of correction are being followed by the private prison contractor and its personnel;

The duty, as set forth in section 20-209B, Idaho Code, to prevent, control and suppress serious disturbances, including riots, escapes, affrays and insurrections at a private prison facility that houses prisoners pursuant to a contract between the private prison contractor and the state board of correction, that, in the director of the Idaho department of correction’s discretion, threaten the health, safety, security and property of the facility, facility staff, prisoners, the public and the state of Idaho. This duty shall be exercised in the director of the Idaho department of correction’s discretion after consultation with the private prison contractor. The director of the Idaho department of correction shall designate personnel and facilities under the control of the state board of correction and shall enter into such agreements as deemed necessary with other governmental entities, to respond to serious disturbances at a private prison facility.
(7) No contract for correctional services may authorize, allow, or imply a delegation of authority or responsibility to a private prison contractor which would allow the contractor to:

(a) Develop or implement procedures for calculating inmate release dates;

(b) Approve the type of work inmates may perform and the wages which may be given to inmates engaging in the work;

(c) Place an inmate under less restrictive custody or more restrictive custody or take any disciplinary actions contrary to rules and procedures approved by the Idaho department of correction;

(d) Develop or implement procedures regarding the care, custody and treatment of inmates which are contrary to the Idaho department of correction’s policies and procedures, state or federal law.

(8) Any offense, which if committed in a state institution or facility would be a crime, including escape, shall also be a crime if committed by or with regard to offenders assigned to an institution or facility operated pursuant to a contract between the state and a private prison contractor.

(9) Any reference in the Idaho Code to imprisonment in a state penitentiary, or state prison, or incarceration under the control and custody of the Idaho board of correction shall be interpreted to include incarceration in a private prison facility.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-241A, as added by 1997, ch. 223, § 3, p. 655; am. 2010, ch. 351, § 3, p. 915.

§ 20-242. Furlough.

When a person is committed to the custody of the state board of correction, the board may, upon conditions which it may impose, direct that the person be permitted to continue in his regular employment, work project, or educational program, if that is compatible with the requirements of subsection 3 of this section, or may authorize the person to secure employment for himself.

If the board directs that the prisoner be permitted to continue in his regular employment or education, the board shall arrange for a continuation of the employment or education so far as possible without interruption. If the prisoner does not have regular employment, and the board has authorized the prisoner to secure employment for himself, the prisoner may do so, and the board may assist him in doing so.

Whenever the prisoner is not employed and between the hours or periods of employment, work project, or schooling, he shall be domiciled in a jail, facility, or residence as directed by the board of correction.

The earnings of the prisoner shall be retained by the prisoner under such terms and conditions as the board may impose. From such earnings the board may require that:

a. the prisoner pay an amount to the board of correction sufficient for the prisoner’s board and personal expenses, both inside and outside the jail, facility, or residence, including costs of administering such prisoner’s work furlough program;

b. the prisoner provide for the reasonable and adequate support and maintenance of the prisoner’s dependents;

c. the prisoner pay preexisting debts;

d. the prisoner deposit earnings in a financial institution.

5. If the prisoner violates the conditions established for his conduct, custody or employment, the board may order the balance of the prisoner’s sentence to be spent in actual confinement.

6. The wilful failure of a prisoner to return to the place of confinement not later than the expiration of any period during which he is authorized to be away from the place of confinement under this section is an escape from the place of confinement and is punishable as provided by section 18-2505, Idaho Code.

7. A furlough may be revoked by the board at any time without notice or hearing.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 42, p. 59; am. 1970, ch. 143, § 13, p. 425; am. 1979, ch. 215, § 1, p. 599; am. 1984, ch. 58, § 1, p. 106.